en: Common mussels
fr: Moules communes

en: Mediterranean mussels
de: Mittelmeer-Muscheln
es: Mejillones del Mediterráneo
fr: Moules de Méditerranée
hr: Mediteranske dagnje
it: Cozze del Mediterraneo
nl: Middellandse Zee mosselen
ru: Средиземноморские мидии

fr: Moules du Pacifique
de: Pazifische Miesmuscheln
es: Mejillones del Pacífico
it: Cozze del Pacifico
ja: 太平洋ムール貝
nl: Stille Oceaan mosselen
ru: Тихоокеанские мидии
tr: Pasifik midye

en: Mussels in a shallot and white wine broth
fr: Moules marinières, Moules aux oignons et au vin blanc

en: Filled mussels, Mussels filled with fat parsley and garlic
fr: Moules farcies, Moules farcies en persillade

en: Boiled mussels, Mussels cooked in water
fr: Moules bouillies, Moules cuites à l'eau
hr: Kuhane dagnje
nl: Gekookte mosselen

en: Frozen cooked mussels
fr: Moules cuites surgelées

en: Canned mussels
de: Miesmuscheln in Dosen, Muscheln in Dosen
es: Mejillones enlatados
fi: purkitetut simpukat
fr: Moules en conserve, Moules appertisées
hr: Dagnje u konzervi
it: Mitili in scatola
nl: Mossels in blik/pot
ro: Conserve de midii

en: Mussels with escabeche
de: Muscheln mit Escabeche
es: Mejillones en escabeche, Mejillon en escabeche
fr: Moules à l'escabèche
hr: Dagnje s escabecheom

en: Canned mussels in Catalan sauce, Canned mussels in Catalan-style sauce, Canned mussels in Catalan-style marinade, Canned mussels in tomato sauce
fr: Moules à la sauce catalane, Moules à la sauce escabèche, Moules appertisées à la sauce catalane, Moules appertisées à la sauce escabèche, Moules appertisées à la sauce tomate

en: Oysters
de: Austern
es: Ostras
fi: Osterit
fr: Huîtres
hr: Kamenice
it: Ostriche
ja: カキ, 牡蠣
nl: Oesters
ro: Stridii

en: Pacific oysters
fr: Huîtres creuses

en: European oysters
fr: Huîtres plates

en: Frozen oysters
fr: Huîtres surgelées

en: Cuttlefish
de: Tintenfische
fr: Seiche
hr: Sipa
ja: コウイカ

en: Frozen cuttlefish
fr: Seiche surgelée

en: Cuttlefish ink, Squid ink
fr: Encre de sèche

en: Common octopus
fr: Poulpe
hr: Obična hobotnica
ja: マダコ

en: Cooked common octopus, Common cooked octopus
fr: Poulpes cuits

en: Frozen common octopus
fr: Poulpe surgelé